Indiana, session 2026, SB151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-26-9-20.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20.1. (a) As used in this section,
"federal community eligibility provision" refers to the federal
community eligibility provision:
(1) under 42 U.S.C. 1759a and 7 CFR 245.9(f), as in effect on
January 1, 2026; and
(2) administered by the United States Department of
Agriculture;
that is an alternative reimbursement option for eligible school
corporations with a high concentration of low income students to
provide universal free school breakfast and lunch to all students.
(b) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the department shall
provide technical assistance to a school corporation that:
(1) is eligible to participate in the federal community
eligibility provision; and
(2) elects to participate in the federal community eligibility
2026 IN 151—LS 6491/DI 143


provision.
2026 IN 151—LS 6491/DI 143